Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5822.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly finds that:
(1) Facilitating and promoting installation of renewable energy infrastructure to reduce
carbon emissions that contribute to climate change requires consideration of siting impacts on the
environment.
(2) Installing renewable energy infrastructure on areas ill-suited for diverse development
types, which includes interstate rights of way and state-owned properties such as the parking areas
and rooftops of public, municipal, or state-owned buildings, would assist the state to meet its
climate resiliency goals, including those established in chapter 6.2 of title 42 ("act on climate"),
while minimizing environmental impact.
(3) Placing solar energy systems on interstate rights of way would ensure that solar energy
systems are not surrounded by sunlight blocking structures, and ensure that engineers will have
clear access for the purposes of construction, interconnection, repair, and maintenance.
(4) The use of interstate rights of way to accommodate solar energy systems is permissible
provided such developments comply with federal laws, federal regulations, state law, and the state
utility accommodation policy.
(5) By using interstate rights of way, Rhode Island can reduce the number of trees required
to be removed to support the installation of solar energy systems, and promote the preservation of
trees.

(6) The department of transportation has identified at least two hundred (200) acres at
several sites on interstate rights of way that are potential viable locations for solar energy systems.
(7) The department of environmental management has developed guidelines for the
installation of solar energy systems on sites within their jurisdiction, and offers pre-application
meetings with applicants to coordinate projects that involve multiple permits, in order to decrease
the time necessary to process the proposal.
(8) Challenges to successful implementation of solar energy systems includes the cost and
process necessary to interconnect solar energy systems to the electrical grid.
(9) The state may expedite solar energy system installations by having state agencies and
key stakeholders with jurisdiction and/or subject matter expertise provide technical assistance and
professional advice.
SECTION 2. Title 39 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC UTILITIES AND
CARRIERS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 36
SOLAR SITING ADVISORY TASKFORCE
39-36-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Eligible property” means a property owned by the state including: the parking areas
and rooftops of a public, municipal, or state-owned building; an interstate right of way; or such
other location as the taskforce may determine appropriate and which are subject to the jurisdiction
of the state.
(2) “Interstate right of way” means the undeveloped area on highway medians, off ramps,
and interchanges.
(3) “Power purchase agreement” means an agreement:
(i) Between a customer and a solar retailer;
(ii) For the customer’s purchase of electricity generated by a residential solar energy system
owned by the solar retailer; and
(iii) That provides for the customer to make payments over a term of at least five (5) years.
(4) “Solar energy system” means a system or configuration of solar energy devices that
collects and uses solar energy to generate electricity.
39-36-2. Solar siting advisory taskforce.
(a) There is hereby established a solar siting advisory taskforce (the “taskforce”). The
taskforce shall consist of nine (9) members as follows:
(1) The director of the department of transportation, or designee;
LC002057 - Page 2 of 4

(2) The chairperson of the state properties committee, or designee;
(3) The chairperson of the public utilities commission, or designee;
(4) The director of the department of environmental management, or designee;
(5) The commissioner of the office of energy resources, or designee;
(6) The secretary of commerce, or designee;
(7) One representative of an electric distribution company that does business in Rhode
Island to be appointed by the governor; and
(8) Two (2) members of the public who shall have experience with the assembly and
installation of solar energy systems to be appointed by the governor.
(b) The purpose of this taskforce shall be to provide recommendations, advice and guidance
to help expedite and facilitate the development of solar energy systems on eligible property.
(c) In furtherance of the purposes of the taskforce stated in subsection (b) of this section,
the taskforce shall, consistent with the provisions of chapter 2 of title 37 ("state purchases"), provide
recommendations to the appropriate state agencies regarding the proposed use of an eligible
property for the installation of a solar energy system and make any such suggestions as the taskforce
deems necessary to advance the successful installation of the solar energy system at the eligible
property.
39-36-3. Annual Report.
The taskforce shall submit an annual report on the taskforce’s activities for the previous
calendar year, on or before September 8, 2026, and annually thereafter, to the governor, the speaker
of the house, and the president of the senate. This report shall include a cost-benefit analysis of the
implementation of solar energy systems on eligible properties as set forth in this chapter.
39-36-4. Sunset.
The provisions of this chapter shall expire and sunset on September 8, 2028.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall sunset on September 8, 2028.
========
LC002057
========
LC002057 - Page 3 of 4